Hawaii statutes.
[§846-18] Statistical crime
reporting responsibility of county chiefs of police and state and county
agencies. The chiefs of police of the counties and state and county
agencies having the power of arrest shall provide to the attorney general crime
incident reports and any other information regarding crimes committed within
their respective jurisdictions as necessary for the attorney general to operate
a statewide crime reporting program and to cooperate with the Federal Bureau of
Investigation's uniform crime reporting program. The reports and information
shall be submitted to the attorney general in the manner, form, and time
schedule as the attorney general may prescribe.

The attorney general may audit the reporting
entities to determine the accuracy of the reports and other information required
by this section. [L 2016, c 155, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next